Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5726.
PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF MICHIGAN ENACT:
CHAPTER V
Sec. 2. (1) The state transportation department of state
JJR H01164'25 (H-2) hev0g4


highways and transportation shall administer ridesharing programs
in the this state and shall do all of the following:
(a) Develop a comprehensive state ridesharing program. The
program shall must examine and recommend application of various
ridesharing methods, including carpooling, vanpooling, buspooling,
park-and-ride lots, and public transportation.
(b) Provide technical assistance to local transportation and
planning agencies.
(c) Develop and maintain computer or manual matching systems
for ridesharing programs.
(d) Contract with public and private organizations to perform
ridesharing matching programs.
(e) Develop and undertake ridesharing promotional programs.
(f) Coordinate the development of a statewide program of park-
and-ride lots.
(g) Coordinate and encourage the development of highway
facilities which that give preferential treatment to ridesharing
vehicles.
(h) Develop and manage state ridesharing programs.
(i) Work with local transit agencies, where applicable, to
prioritize intermodal transfer points at park-and-ride lots and
carpool lots.
(j) Allow access to state-owned park-and-ride lots and carpool
lots for transit agencies that seek to use state-owned park-and-
ride lots or carpool lots as intermodal transfer points, whether or
not state transportation department accommodations were provided in
the construction of the state-owned park-and-ride lots or carpool
lots, except where the department determines that granting access
would create a documented safety or operational conflict.
JJR H01164'25 (H-2) hev0g4


(2) The legislature shall annually appropriate sufficient
funds money to implement this section.
Final Page
JJR H01164'25 (H-2) hev0g4